Utah statutes.
63B-10-302.   Other revenue bond authorizations.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership Authority, under the authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act, may issue or execute obligations to provide up to $12,000,000 for the construction of a 36-hole golf course at Soldier Hollow in the Wasatch Mountain State Park, including necessary facilities such as a clubhouse, restroom facilities, and maintenance facilities, together with additional amounts necessary to:

(a)  pay costs of issuance;

(b)  pay capitalized interest; and

(c)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.

(2)  The State Building Ownership Authority shall work cooperatively with the Division of Parks and Recreation in the design and construction of the golf course at Soldier Hollow.

